District of Columbia statutes.
2-308.05

Repealed

Claims by contractor against District government.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 805, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(y), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.5.